Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3597
Hospital authority; structures; construction; submission of plans.

Prior to constructing any structure which is to be utilized as a hospital or as a nursing home, as opposed to structures related thereto, the question of constructing such structure shall be submitted to the appropriate local or area health planning agency for its consideration and review if there has been created, pursuant to state or federal law, such a local or area health planning agency having jurisdiction within the area in which the proposed structure is to be constructed. Such local or area health planning agency shall within sixty days render its findings and recommendations, if any, and shall be deemed to have approved construction of the proposed structure if its findings and recommendations have not been rendered within such period of sixty days. The provisions of this section shall not apply to the purchase or other acquisition by an authority of any interest in any existing structure which is to be utilized as a hospital if such structure has been in existence for more than one year.

Laws 1971, LB 54, § 22;

Laws 1972, LB 1382, § 3;

Laws 1986, LB 733, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.95.